Washington statutes.
RCW 36.74.030

Declaration of intention to assume—Abolition of city or county governing body—Transfer of rights, powers, immunities, functions, and obligations to city or county.

(1) If, after receiving testimony, the city or county legislative authority determines that the public interest or welfare would be satisfied by the city or county assuming the rights, powers, immunities, functions, and obligations of the transportation benefit district, the city or county legislative authority may declare that to be its intent and assume such rights, powers, immunities, functions, and obligations by ordinance or resolution, providing that the city or county is vested with every right, power, immunity, function, and obligation currently granted to or possessed by the transportation benefit district.

(2) Upon assumption of the rights, powers, immunities, functions, and obligations of the transportation benefit district by the city or county, the governing body established pursuant to RCW 36.73.020 must be abolished and the city or county legislative authority is vested with all rights, powers, immunities, functions, and obligations otherwise vested by law in the governing board of the transportation benefit district.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 303.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 44: See note following RCW 46.68.395.